Massachusetts, session 194th, S407.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a special commission governed by section 2A of chapter 4 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, to assess and set standards for the default
apportionment formula used by regional school districts in their agreements as specified under
Section 14B of Chapter 71 and whether standards for apportionment should include the number
of students OR the total property values in a town.
The commission shall also recommend whether each town in the commonwealth shall be
mandated to either have its own school district or belong to a regional school district.
The commission shall file its findings and recommendations, together with drafts of
legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, with the clerks of the senate
and the house of representatives, the chairs of the senate and house committees on public service
and the chairs of the joint commission on education not later than December 1, 2026.
of 2

The commission shall consist of 1 member who shall be appointed by the senate
president, who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader
of the senate; 1 member who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives,
who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives; the commissioner of the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education or a designee; the commissioner of the Department of Revenue or a designee; the
Secretary of the Executive Office for Administration and Finance or designee; 5 regional school
superintendents appointed by the Governor from regional schools in the commonwealth, and 1
member to be appointed by each of the following organizations: Massachusetts Association of
Regional Schools, Rural Policy Advisory Commission, Massachusetts Municipal Association.
of 2